Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-117
Mayor; remission of fines; pardons; powers.

The mayor of a city of the second class shall have power to remit fines and forfeitures and to grant reprieves and pardons for all offenses arising under the ordinances of the city.

Laws 1879, § 18, p. 196;

R.S.1913, § 5009;

C.S.1922, § 4178;

C.S.1929, § 17-117;

R.S.1943, § 17-117;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 13.